New York, session 2025-2026, S5268.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The chief administrator of the courts, in conjunction with 2 the office of information technology services, shall establish a state- 3 wide strategy plan under which a statewide electronic portal shall be 4 developed and made available through the unified court system to enable 5 district attorneys, institutional defense providers, private attorneys 6 and assigned counsel to provide required discovery disclosure to oppos- 7 ing counsel in criminal cases. The portal shall be available for use no 8 later than January 1, 2027. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06638-01-5